Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.50.030

Photograph and information—Publication. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

Each lobbyist shall at the time the lobbyist registers submit electronically to the commission a recent photograph of the lobbyist of a size and format as determined by rule of the commission, together with the name of the lobbyist's employer, the length of the lobbyist's employment as a lobbyist before the legislature, a brief biographical description, and any other information the lobbyist may wish to submit not to exceed 50 words in length. The photograph, information, and attestation submitted under RCW 29B.50.010(1)(j) shall be published by the commission on its website.

[ 2024 c 164 s 475. Prior: 2019 c 469 s 3; 2019 c 428 s 30; 2010 c 204 s 802; 1995 c 397 s 6; 1985 c 367 s 8; 1982 c 147 s 11; 1975 1st ex.s. c 294 s 21. Formerly RCW 42.17A.605, 42.17.155.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2019 c 469 ss 2 and 3: See note following RCW 29B.50.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—1995 c 397: See note following RCW 29B.40.020.